Utah statutes.
10-7-14.3.   Time limit for cities of first class.
In cities of the first class the authority to levy an additional .0008 per
dollar of taxable value of taxable property above the overall limitation
provided by Section 10-6-133 shall be limited to a period of ten years from
the date of the first levy.
